Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 2
ADULTERATION AND BRANDING

Sec.

§ 37-201 — 37-216. Manufacture or sale of adulterated or misbranded articles prohibited — Distribution of free samples prohibited — Inspectors’ right of access — Standards established — Disposition of fines. [Repealed.]

§ 37-217. Sale of tainted food a misdemeanor. [Repealed.]

§ 37-218 — 37-222. Baking powders and vinegars, regulation. [Repealed.]

§ 37-223. Nonfat dry milk solids, defatted milk solids and milk defined. [Repealed.]